trunk/apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="plug__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ged</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ged</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ging</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ging</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ging</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    
<pardef n="sl/ink__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ink</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ink</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inks</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>unk</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>unk</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   

<pardef n="dub__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>bed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>bed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>bing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>bing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>bing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    
<pardef n="bed__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ded</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ded</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
      
    
<pardef n="program__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>med</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>med</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ming</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ming</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ming</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    
<pardef n="ag/e__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  

                                                                 

                        <e lm="dub"><i>dub</i> <par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="kid"><i>kid</i> <par n="bed__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="debug"><i>debug</i> <par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="bed"><i>bed</i> <par n="bed__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="age"><i>ag</i> <par n="ag/e__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="drug"><i>drug</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="unplug"><i>unplug</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="gum"><i>gum</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="pad"><i>pad</i><par n="bed__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="rub"><i>rub</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="slam"><i>slam</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="beg"><i>beg</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="drag"><i>drag</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="nod"><i>nod</i><par n="bed__vblex"/></e>
